Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.133.010

Program created.

The educational assistance grant program for students with dependents is hereby created, subject to the availability of receipts of gifts, grants, or endowments from private sources. The program is created to serve students who demonstrate financial need with dependents eighteen years of age or younger, by assisting them directly through a grant program to pursue a degree or certificate at public or private institutions of higher education, as defined in RCW 28B.92.030(4) (a) and (b) (i) and (ii), that participate in the Washington college grant program.

[ 2019 c 406 s 46; 2013 c 248 s 4; 2004 c 275 s 72; 2003 c 19 s 2.]

NOTES:

Findings—Intent—2019 c 406: See note following RCW 43.79.195.

Findings—Short title—2019 c 406: See notes following RCW 28B.92.200.

Findings—2019 c 406: See note following RCW 28B.94.020.

Findings—Intent—2019 c 406: See note following RCW 28C.30.050.

Findings—Intent—2019 c 406: See note following RCW 43.216.135.

Findings—Intent—Effective date—2013 c 248: See notes following RCW 28B.92.030.

Part headings not law—2004 c 275: See note following RCW 28B.76.090.